Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1316.01
Correction of tax rolls.

The county assessor of any county shall, at any time, correct the tax rolls as provided in section 77-1613.02 for any real property listed on the assessment roll but omitted from the tax roll.

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. XI, § 6, p. 592;

C.S.1922, § 5903;

C.S.1929, § 77-1006;

Laws 1939, c. 100, § 1, p. 457;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1006;

R.S.1943, § 77-518;

Laws 1947, c. 250, § 11, p. 791;

Laws 1949, c. 226, § 1, p. 631;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-518;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 70.

County board may equalize assessments of omitted property. Fromkin v. State, 158 Neb. 377, 63 N.W.2d 332 (1954).

Under this section, county assessors are authorized to add omitted property to the tax rolls for the current year. In re Estate of Rogers, 147 Neb. 1, 22 N.W.2d 297 (1946).